test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ruakk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ruâkk â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ruâkk
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ruâǥǥ
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ruâǥǥ
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ruõkˈku
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ruâǥǥast
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ruâǥǥain
     ruâkk+N+Ess+Indef: ruâkkan
     ruâkk+N+Par+Indef: ruâkkad
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ruâǥǥtaa, ruâǥǥtää]
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ruâǥǥ
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ruâǥǥai
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ruâǥǥaid
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ruâǥǥaid
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ruâǥǥain
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ruâǥǥaivuiʹm
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ruâǥǥaitaa, ruâǥǥaitää]
     ruâkk+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ruõǥǥuž
